src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! Prefixes

LEXICON person_prefixes
@U.pn.sg1@:@U.pn.sg1@ny     nv_lex ;
@U.pn.sg2@:@U.pn.sg2@py     nv_lex ;
@U.pn.sg3m@:@U.pn.sg3m@y  nv_lex ;
@U.pn.sg3f@:@U.pn.sg3f@õ     nv_lex ;
@U.pn.pl1@:@U.pn.pl1@ã     nv_lex ;
@U.pn.pl2@:@U.pn.pl2@hĩ     nv_lex ;
@U.pn.pl3@:@U.pn.pl3@ỹ     nv_lex ;


LEXICON nv_lex
Nouns ;
Verbs ;


!! Suffixes
! Facundes (2000:322, table 3)
!
!  1	   2	      3	    4		5	6	7	8	9	10	11	12	13
!  Distr   Caus	      Intr  Augm	T.Caus	Fact	ColTV	Prog	Almost	Random	Intens	Desid	RS
!  -puku   -ka2	      -rewa -puwa	-kũtaka	-ã2	-pirĩka	-nany	-wari	-ãpu	-ka1	-ene	-pira
!tv +	   +	      #	    
!iv #	   +	      +
! Facundes (2000:330, table 4)
!Table 4: Suffixes of Class2 and their Position Classes
!   14	  15	   16	     17	       18	19
!   Vblz  Hypoth   Recipr    Immin     Caus	Hab
!   -ta	  -ã3	   -kaka     -napanu   -ka3	-pi
!tv +	  +	   -	     +	       +	+
!iv +	  +	   +	     +	       +	+


LEXICON v_suf
+V: v_person ;

LEXICON v_person
@U.pn.sg1@+Sg1:@U.pn.sg1@        # ;
@U.pn.sg2@+Sg2:@U.pn.sg2@        # ;
@U.pn.sg3m@+Sg3+Msc:@U.pn.sg3m@  # ;
@U.pn.sg3f@+Sg3+Fem:@U.pn.sg3f@  # ;
@U.pn.pl1@+Pl1:@U.pn.pl1@        # ;
@U.pn.pl2@+Pl2:@U.pn.pl2@        # ;
@U.pn.pl3@+Pl3:@U.pn.pl3@na      # ;


LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_01
!n-arika-ru ScSg1+Oc3+Masc
!karuwa-ta-no non-indian+VBLZ+OcSg1
!0-upũ-pe
 V_SUFFIXES_02 ; !This may allow all
+Der+Der/NomAct+N:%^VowRM%>inhi N_SUFFIXES_02 ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:%>myna N_SUFFIXES_02 ;
@D.PN@+Relzr-Subj+Msc:@D.PN@%>ta%>kary # ; ! should this relativizer have %>ta here ?
@D.PN@+Relzr-Subj+Fem:@D.PN@%>ta%>karu # ;
@D.PN@+Relzr-Obj+Msc:@D.PN@%>ta%>kyty # ;
@D.PN@+Relzr-Obj+Fem:@D.PN@%>ta%>kytu # ; ! 
+Pftv:%>pe # ;
+Pftv+Pss:%>pe%^VowNasL%>ka V_SUFFIXES_02 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_02
@R.PN.SG1@+ScSg1:@R.PN.SG1@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL1@+ScPl1:@R.PN.PL1@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.SG2@+ScSg2:@R.PN.SG2@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL2@+ScPl2:@R.PN.PL2@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.SG3M@+ScSg3+Msc:@R.PN.SG3M@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.SG3F@+ScSg3+Fem:@R.PN.SG3F@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL3M@+ScPl3+Msc:@R.PN.PL3M@%>na V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@R.PN.PL3F@+ScPl3+Fem:@R.PN.PL3F@%>na V_SUFFIXES_03 ;
@D.PN@ V_SUFFIXES_03 ;

LEXICON V_SUFFIXES_03
+OcSg1:%>no Verbs_END ;
+OcPl1:%>wa Verbs_END ;
+OcSg2:%>i Verbs_END ;
+OcPl2:%>i Verbs_END ;
+Oc3M:%>ry Verbs_END ; ! Singular and Plural
+Oc3F:%>ru Verbs_END ;
 Verbs_END ;

LEXICON Verbs_END
# ;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
