src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in APURINÃ language are actions.

LEXICON Verbs
aiata+V:aiata V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV ??" ;
apuka+V:apuka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV find" ;
arika+V:arika V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV set on fire" ;
ãta+V:ãta V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV drink" ;
atama+V:atama V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV watch" ;
etama+V:etama V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV see" ;
kama+V:kama V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV make" ;
mapuruka+V:mapuruka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV ??" ;
myteka+V:myteka V_SUFFIXES_01 "IV run" ;
nhika+V:nhika V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV eat" ;
pata+V:pata V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV cover" ;
taka+V:taka    V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV put" ;
uka+V:uka V_SUFFIXES_01 "TV kill" ;
!taka+V:taka    v_suf "put"  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
